Hawaii statutes.
[§11-357] Contributions to candidate
committees; limits. (a) No person shall make contributions to:

(1) A candidate seeking nomination or election to a
two-year office or to a candidate committee in an aggregate amount greater than
$2,000 during an election period;

(2) A candidate seeking nomination or election to a
four-year nonstatewide office or to a candidate committee in an aggregate
amount greater than $4,000 during an election period; or

(3) A candidate seeking nomination or election to a
four-year statewide office or to a candidate committee in an aggregate amount
greater than $6,000 during an election period.

(b) For purposes of this section, the length
of term of an office shall be the usual length of term of the office as
unaffected by reapportionment, a special election to fill a vacancy, or any
other factor causing the term of the office the candidate is seeking to be less
than the usual length of term of that office. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next